Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1455.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; department of transportation; State Route 24; Ironwood Drive; extension The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for surveying, designing and studying the extension of State Route 24 east of Ironwood Drive.